Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 17
HEALTH REGULATIONS FOR EATING PLACES AND FOOD ESTABLISHMENTS — GRADING AND LICENSING

Sec.

§ 39-1701 — 39-1704. Jurisdiction of director — “Eating place” defined — Application to butchers, bakers, and candy makers — Employment of diseased persons prohibited. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1705. Health certificate. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1706. Penalties for violations. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1707. Designation of physicians to conduct examinations. [Repealed.]

§ 39-1708 — 39-1710. [Reserved.]

§ 39-1711 — 39-1716. Grades and licenses — Licensing of applicants — Rules and regulations — Revocation of licenses — Definitions — Penalty. [Repealed.]